Hawaii statutes.
§302A-604 Complex area superintendents. The
superintendent of education, with the approval of the board, shall appoint
complex area superintendents for schools. The complex area superintendents
shall supervise the delivery of administrative and instructional support
services within their respective complex areas, including:

(1) Personnel, fiscal, and facilities support;

(2) Monitoring of compliance with applicable state
and federal laws;

(3) Curriculum development, student assessment, and
staff development services; and

(4) Special education programs and special schools
within the complex area. [L 1996, c 89, pt of §2; am L 2003, c 187, §7; am L
2012, c 133, §11]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next